District of Columbia statutes.
10-608

Purposes for which borrowed moneys may be used.

The sum authorized by § 10-607, or any part thereof shall, when advanced, be available to the Mayor of the District of Columbia for the acquisition by dedication, purchase, or condemnation of the fee simple title to land, or rights or easements in land, for the public uses authorized by §§ 10-607 to 10-611, and for the preparation of plans, designs, estimates, models, and specifications, and for architectural and other necessary professional services without reference to § 2-225.05 [repealed], for the construction of buildings, including materials and labor, heating, lighting, elevators, plumbing, landscaping, and all other appurtenances, and the purchase and installation of machinery, furniture, equipment, apparatus, and any and all other expenditures necessary for or incident to the complete construction and equipment for use of the aforesaid buildings and plants. All contracts, agreements, and proceedings in court for condemnation or otherwise, pursuant to §§ 10-607 to 10-611 shall be had and made in accordance with existing provisions of law except as otherwise herein provided.

History

June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1204, ch. 704, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-208.
1973 Ed., § 9-209.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.